Utah statutes.
31A-3-104.   Technology fees -- Restricted account.

(1)  The commissioner may impose a fee for requests for information:

(a)  that is obtained from an electronic database of the commissioner; or

(b)  derived from data that is generated by electronic means.

(2)  In addition to any fee authorized in this title, the commissioner shall impose a supplemental fee on the issuance or renewal of any of the following issued by the department:

(a)  a license;

(b)  a registration; or

(c)  a certificate of authority.

(3)  A fee imposed under this section shall be:

(a)  established in accordance with Section 31A-3-103; and

(b)  deposited into the Technology Development Restricted Account.

(4) (a)  There is created in the General Fund a restricted account known as the "Technology Development Restricted Account."

(b)  The Technology Development Restricted Account shall consist of the fees imposed by the commissioner in accordance with this section.

(c)  The commissioner shall administer the Technology Development Restricted Account.  Subject to appropriations by the Legislature, the commissioner shall use the money deposited into the Technology Development Restricted Account to provide services through use of electronic commerce or other similar technology.

(d)  An appropriation from the Technology Development Restricted Account is nonlapsing.



Amended by Chapter 10, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 265, 2010 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

